Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 43 Administrative Adjudication Court [Repealed.]

31-43-1 — 31-43-1.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 33; P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 7; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 1999.

31-43-1.3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1998, ch. 91, § 2, effective October 1, 1998.

31-43-2 — 31-43-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

These sections (P.L. 1974, ch. 41, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 17; P.L. 1978, ch. 217, §§ 2, 4; P.L. 1980, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 400, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 189, §§ 2, 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 228, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 375, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 501, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 570, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 569, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 274, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 57, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 37, § 5; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 488, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 8; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 105; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 1999.

31-43-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 189, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 453, § 5, effective September 1, 1992.

31-43-9 — 31-43-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 376, § 2; P.L. 1985, ch. 458, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 15, § 5; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 22, § 5; P.L. 1989, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 494, §§ 9, 10; P.L. 1990, ch. 507, §§ 8, 9; P.L. 1991, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1991, ch. 174, § 6; P.L. 1992, ch. 453, §§ 6, 7; P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 40; P.L. 1997, ch. 93, §§ 5, 6; Repealed by P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 1999.